Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5650.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act, "litigation" means either of the following: (a) An action at law brought by the attorney general on behalf of this state or of the people of this state. (b) An action at law in which the attorney general has intervened and appeared on behalf of the people of this state. Sec. 2. (1) If total state expenditures related to litigation exceed $250,000.00, or if the attorney general estimates that total state expenditures related to litigation will exceed $250,000.00, the attorney general shall submit a report regarding the litigation 1 time every 6 months to each member of the house of representatives appropriations committee, each member of the house of representatives oversight committee, each member of the senate appropriations committee, and each member of the senate oversight committee. Each report must include all of the following: (a) An accounting of the expenditures, including an estimate of future expenditures. (b) An explanation of the litigation. (c) Justification for the expenditures described in subdivision (a). (2) Not later than 60 days after a final order is entered in litigation described in subsection (1) and all rights of appeal have been exhausted or the time for appeal has expired, the attorney general shall submit a final report regarding the litigation to each member of the house of representatives appropriations committee, each member of the house of representatives oversight committee, each member of the senate appropriations committee, and each member of the senate oversight committee. The report must include both of the following: (a) An accounting of the expenditures. (b) Justification for the expenditures described in subdivision (a). Sec. 3. If the attorney general fails to submit a report in accordance with section 2, both of the following apply: (a) A member of the house of representatives appropriations committee, house of representatives oversight committee, senate appropriations committee, or senate oversight committee may seek judicial relief, including a writ of mandamus, to compel the attorney general to submit the report. The court shall award costs and reasonable attorney fees and may impose a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 per day for each day that the report remains overdue. A fine collected under this subdivision must be deposited into the state general fund. A fine imposed under this subdivision must be paid from an appropriation made to the department of attorney general in a general appropriations bill and must not be paid from the state general fund. (b) The auditor general shall submit a report to the legislature that details the attorney general's expenditures related to the litigation, including any violations of this act.